Georgia, session 2025_26, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
S. B. 226
- 1 -

25 LC 56 0309
16 SECTION 1.
17 Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to labor and industrial relations,
18 is amended by adding a new chapter to read as follows:
19 "CHAPTER 11
20 34-11-1.
21 As used in this chapter, the term:
22 (1) 'Administrative expenses' means all expenses incurred in the operation of the
23 program, including investment expenses, board expenses, and expenses associated with
24 operating the Peach State Saves program.
25 (2) 'Board' means the Peach State Saves program board of trustees as provided for in
26 Code Section 34-11-3, whose purpose is to administer the program.
27 (3) 'Covered employee' means an individual who is employed by a covered employer,
28 who has wages or other compensation that is taxable by the state, and who is 18 years of
29 age or older. Such term shall not include:
30 (A) Any employee covered under the federal Railway Labor Act, 45 U.S.C.
31 Section 151;
32 (B) Any employee on whose behalf an employer makes contributions to a
33 multiemployer pension trust fund under 29 U.S.C. Section 186; or
34 (C) Any individual who is an employee of:
35 (i) The federal government;
36 (ii) Any state government in the United States;
37 (iii) Any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of this state or any
38 other state of the United States;
S. B. 226
- 2 -

25 LC 56 0309
39 (iv) Any employee for whom the employer does not pay unemployment insurance
40 premiums in this state according to the records of the Department of Labor; or
41 (v) Any employee who has been employed by a covered employer who was first
42 employed by such covered employer on or after January 1 of the current calendar
43 year.
44 (4) 'Covered employer' means any person, partnership, limited liability company,
45 corporation, or other entity engaged in a business, industry, profession, trade, or other
46 enterprise in the state, including a nonprofit entity, that employs, and during the previous
47 calendar year employed, at least five covered employees, and that has been in business
48 in this state for at least one complete calendar year. Such term shall not include:
49 (A) The federal government;
50 (B) The State of Georgia;
51 (C) Any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of the state; or
52 (D) Any employer that has maintained a specified tax-favored retirement plan, other
53 than the Peach State Saves program, for its employees at any time within the preceding
54 two years.
55 (5) 'ERISA' means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C.
56 Section 1001, et seq.
57 (6) 'Internal Revenue Code' means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
58 amended.
59 (7) 'IRA' means a traditional or Roth individual retirement account or individual
60 retirement annuity under Section 408(a), 408(b), or 408A of the Internal Revenue Code.
61 (8) 'Participant' means a covered employee or other individual who has a balance
62 credited to his or her account under the program.
63 (9) 'Participating employer' means a covered employer that is participating in the
64 program.
S. B. 226
- 3 -

25 LC 56 0309
65 (10) 'Payroll deduction IRA' means an arrangement by which a covered employer allows
66 covered employees to contribute to an IRA by means of payroll deduction.
67 (11) 'Program' means the Peach State Saves program provided for in this chapter.
68 (12) 'Roth IRA' means a Roth individual retirement account or individual retirement
69 annuity under Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code.
70 (13) 'Specified tax-favored retirement plan' means a retirement plan that is tax qualified
71 under, or is described in and satisfies the requirements of, Section 401(a), 401(k), 403(a),
72 403(b), 408(k), or 408(p) of the Internal Revenue Code.
73 (14) 'Total fees and expenses' means all fees, costs, and expenses, including, but not
74 limited to, administrative expenses, investment expenses, investment advice expenses,
75 accounting costs, actuarial costs, legal costs, marketing expenses, education expenses,
76 trading costs, insurance annuitization costs, and other miscellaneous costs.
77 (15) 'Traditional IRA' means a traditional individual retirement account or traditional
78 individual retirement annuity under Section 408(a) or (b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
79 (16) 'Wages' means any compensation, as such term is defined in Section 219(f)(1) of
80 the Internal Revenue Code, paid to a covered employee by his or her employer during a
81 calendar year.
82 34-11-2.
83 There is created, for the purposes described in this chapter, the Peach State Saves program
84 which shall be a budget unit to which funds may be appropriated as provided in Part 1 of
85 Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the 'Budget Act.'
86 34-11-3.
87 (a) The administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the program and for
88 effectuating this chapter are vested in the board.
S. B. 226
- 4 -

25 LC 56 0309
89 (b) The board shall be composed of all members of the Board of Trustees of the
90 Employees' Retirement System of Georgia and three additional members appointed by the
91 Governor, each of whom shall have relevant expertise in retirement, investments, or small
92 business.
93 (c) To effect staggered terms of office for members of the board appointed by the
94 Governor, and effective with members appointed for terms beginning in 2025, the
95 Governor shall appoint for terms effective January 1, 2026, one member for a two-year
96 term of office, one member for a three-year term of office, and one member for a four-year
97 term of office. Thereafter, all members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed to
98 serve four-year terms of office. Members shall be eligible for reappointment.
99 (d) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in
100 the same manner as the original appointment.
101 (e) The board members shall be reimbursed for all actual travel and other expenses
102 necessarily incurred through service on the board. State officials serving ex officio shall
103 not receive the daily expense allowance but shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual
104 expenses.
105 (f) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum to transact
106 business.
107 34-11-4.
108 (a) The board shall have the authority, powers, and duties to:
109 (1) Design and implement the program consistent with the provisions of this chapter;
110 (2) Establish trusts consistent with the provisions of this chapter;
111 (3) Provide for the collection of all moneys provided for in this chapter;
112 (4) Provide for the payment of all administrative expenses;
S. B. 226
- 5 -

25 LC 56 0309
113 (5) Make and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the
114 laws of this state, to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to distribute such rules
115 and regulations to program participants;
116 (6) Determine eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits under this chapter;
117 (7) Keep an accurate account of all the activities, operations, receipts, and expenditures
118 of the program and the board;
119 (8) Cause the program to be designed, established, and operated to:
120 (A) Encourage participation, saving, sound investment practices, and appropriate
121 selection of default investments;
122 (B) Maximize simplicity and ease of administration of the program for eligible
123 employers;
124 (C) Minimize total fees and expenses;
125 (D) Minimize costs, including by collective investment and economies of scale; and
126 (E) Establish rules and procedures promoting portability of benefits, including the
127 ability to make tax-free rollovers or transfers from IRAs under the program to other
128 IRAs or to tax qualified plans that accept such rollovers or transfers, provided that any
129 such rollover is initiated by a participant;
130 (9) Design, develop, and implement the program, and, to that end, conduct market, legal,
131 and feasibility analyses;
132 (10) Establish rules and procedures governing the distribution of funds from the
133 program, including such distributions as may be permitted or required by the program and
134 any applicable provisions of tax laws, with the objectives of maximizing financial
135 security in retirement, protecting spousal rights, and assisting participants to effectively
136 manage the decumulation of their savings and to receive payment of their benefits under
137 the program. The board shall have the authority, in its discretion, to provide for one or
138 more reasonably priced distribution options to provide a source of fixed regular
S. B. 226
- 6 -

25 LC 56 0309
139 retirement income, including income for life or for the participant's life expectancy, or
140 for joint lives and life expectancies, as applicable;
141 (11) Arrange for collective, common, and pooled investment of assets of the program,
142 including investments in conjunction with other funds with which assets are permitted to
143 be collectively invested, to save costs through efficiencies and economies of scale;
144 (12) Employ or retain an executive director, who shall be the executive director of the
145 Employees' Retirement System of Georgia, and a program administrator, staff, trustee,
146 record keeper, investment managers, investment advisers, and other administrative,
147 professional, and expert advisers and service providers, none of whom shall be trustees
148 of the board and all of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the board, which shall
149 determine their duties and compensation. The board may authorize the executive director
150 and other officials to oversee requests for proposals or other public competitions and
151 enter into contracts on behalf of the board or conduct any business necessary for the
152 efficient operation of the program or the board;
153 (13) Arrange for and facilitate compliance by the program, or arrangements established
154 under the program, with all applicable requirements for the program under the Internal
155 Revenue Code, including requirements for favorable tax treatment of the IRAs, and under
156 any other applicable federal or state law and accounting requirements, including using
157 best efforts to implement procedures minimizing the risk that covered employees will
158 contribute more to an IRA than the amount they are eligible under the Internal Revenue
159 Code to contribute to the IRA on a tax-favored basis, and otherwise providing or
160 arranging for assistance to covered employers and covered employees in complying with
161 applicable law and tax related requirements in a cost-effective manner;
162 (14) Establish procedures for the timely and fair resolution of participant and other
163 disputes related to accounts or program operation;
S. B. 226
- 7 -

25 LC 56 0309
164 (15) Evaluate the need for, and procure if and as deemed necessary, insurance against
165 any and all loss in connection with the property, assets, or activities of the program.
166 Evaluate the need for, and procure if and as deemed necessary, pooled private insurance;
167 (16) Indemnify each trustee of the board from personal loss or liability resulting from a
168 trustee's action or inaction;
169 (17) Develop and implement an investment policy defining the program's investment
170 objectives, consistent with the objectives of the program, and providing for policies and
171 procedures consistent with such investment objectives;
172 (18) Cause expenses incurred in the initiation, implementation, maintenance, and
173 administration of the program to be paid from contributions to, or investment returns or
174 assets of, the program or other funds collected by or for the program or pursuant to
175 arrangements established under the program to the extent permitted under federal and
176 state law;
177 (19) Collect application, account, or administrative fees and to accept any grants, gifts,
178 legislative appropriation, loans, and other moneys from the state; any unit of federal,
179 state, or local government; or any other person, firm, or entity to defray the costs of
180 administering and operating the program;
181 (20) Ensure that all contributions to IRAs under the program may be used only to
182 (A) Pay benefits to participants under the program;
183 (B) Pay the administrative costs the program; and
184 (C) Make investments for the benefit of the program; and
185 (21) Collaborate with, and evaluate the role of, financial advisors or other financial
186 professionals, including in assisting and providing guidance for covered employees.
187 (b) The board shall also have all other powers necessary for the proper administration of
188 this chapter.
S. B. 226
- 8 -

25 LC 56 0309
189 34-11-5.
190 (a) Trustees of the board shall discharge their duties as fiduciaries with respect to the
191 program solely in the interest of the program participants as follows:
192 (1) For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to participants and defraying
193 reasonable expenses of administering the program; and
194 (2) With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing
195 that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use
196 in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.
197 (b) A trustee of the board, program administrator, or other staff of the board shall not:
198 (1) Directly or indirectly, have any interest in the making of any investment under the
199 program or in any gains or profits accruing from any such investment;
200 (2) Borrow any program related funds or deposits, or use any such funds or deposits in
201 any manner, for himself or herself or as an agent or partner of others; or
202 (3) Become an endorser, surety, or obligor on investments made under the program.
203 34-11-6.
204 The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board.
205 34-11-7.
206 The board may establish any processes to verify whether a person or entity is a covered
207 employer, including reference to online data and possible use of questions in employer tax
208 filings, consistent with the objective of avoiding to the fullest extent practicable any
209 requirement that an employer that is not a covered employer register with the program or
210 take other action to demonstrate that it maintains a specified tax-favored retirement plan
211 or is exempt for other reasons from being treated as a covered employer.
S. B. 226
- 9 -

25 LC 56 0309
212 34-11-8.
213 (a) Contributions by participants shall be made through payroll deductions. Such amount
214 so deducted shall be credited to the individual account of the participant. Earnings shall
215 be credited to each participant's account pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the
216 board.
217 (b) If the participant ceases to be a covered employee, such participant's account shall
218 continue to accrue earnings in the same manner as any participant's account.
219 (c) A participant's account balance in the program shall at all times be 100 percent vested
220 and nonforfeitable.
221 34-11-9.
222 (a) The board shall, consistent with federal law and regulation, adopt and implement the
223 program, which shall remain in compliance with federal law and regulations once
224 implemented and shall be called the Peach State Saves program.
225 (b) In accordance with program terms and conditions and any rules and regulations
226 promulgated by the board, the program shall:
227 (1) Be set forth in documents prescribing the terms and conditions of the program;
228 (2) Allow eligible individuals in the state to choose whether or not to contribute to an
229 IRA under the program, including allowing covered employees in the state the choice to
230 contribute to an IRA through payroll deduction under the program;
231 (3) Allow for voluntary contributions by others, including self-employed individuals and
232 independent contractors, through payroll deduction or otherwise;
233 (4) Require each covered employer to offer its employees the choice whether or not to
234 contribute to a payroll deduction IRA by automatically enrolling them in the payroll
235 deduction IRA with the opportunity to opt out;
236 (5) Allow, at the discretion of the board, employers that are not covered employers
237 because they are exempt from covered employer status to participate in the program by
S. B. 226
- 10 -

25 LC 56 0309
238 offering program enrollment to their employees, taking into account, among other
239 considerations, the potential legal consequences and the degree of employer demand to
240 participate or facilitate participation by employees;
241 (6) Provide that the IRA to which contributions are made will be a Roth IRA, except that
242 the board shall have the authority at any time to add an option for all participants to
243 affirmatively elect to contribute to a traditional IRA as an alternative to the Roth IRA or
244 to have both a traditional and a Roth IRA through the program;
245 (7) Provide that, unless otherwise specified by a covered employee, the covered
246 employee shall automatically contribute 5 percent of his or her wages to the program,
247 subject in all cases to the IRA contribution dollar limits applicable under the Internal
248 Revenue Code. The board is authorized, in its discretion, from time to time to change,
249 the 5 percent automatic default contribution rate as provided for in paragraph (9) of this
250 subsection;
251 (8) The board shall strive to design and implement investment options available to
252 participants established as part of the program and other program features that are
253 intended to achieve maximum possible income replacement balanced with an appropriate
254 level of risk in an IRA based environment consistent with the investment objectives under
255 the policy. The investment options may encompass a range of risk and return
256 opportunities and allow for a rate of return commensurate with an appropriate level of
257 risk in view of the investment objectives under the policy. The menu of investment
258 options shall be determined taking into account the nature and objectives of the program,
259 the desirability of limiting investment choices under the program to a reasonable number,
260 and the extensive investment choices available to participants in the event that such
261 participants roll over to an IRA outside the program;
262 (9) Provide on a uniform basis, if and when the board so determines and in its discretion,
263 for annual increases of each participant's contribution rate by not more than 1 percent of
264 wages per year, up to a maximum of 10 percent. Any such increases shall apply to
S. B. 226
- 11 -

25 LC 56 0309
265 participants, as determined by the board, by default or only if initiated by affirmative
266 participant election, in either case subject to the IRA contribution limits applicable under
267 the Internal Revenue Code;
268 (10) Permit no employer contributions;
269 (11) Be professionally managed;
270 (12) Provide for direct deposit of contributions into investments under the program; and
271 (13) Provide for reports on the status of each participant's account to be provided to each
272 participant at least annually and make best efforts to provide participants frequent or
273 continual online access to information on the status of their accounts.
274 34-11-10.
275 (a) The board may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the state or any agency
276 thereof to receive outreach, technical assistance, enforcement and compliance services,
277 collection or dissemination of information pertinent to the program, or other services or
278 assistance. The state and any agencies thereof that enter into such agreements shall
279 collaborate to provide the outreach, assistance, information, and compliance or other
280 services or assistance to the board. The agreement may cover the sharing of costs incurred
281 in gathering and disseminating information and the reimbursement of costs for any
282 enforcement activities or assistance. In order to facilitate the implementation of this
283 chapter, the Department of Labor and the Department of Revenue shall be required to enter
284 into such agreements as are necessary to effectuate the program requirements.
285 (b) The board may make and enter into competitively procured contracts, agreements,
286 memoranda of understanding, arrangements, partnerships, or other arrangements to
287 collaborate and cooperate with, and to retain, employ, and contract with or for any of the
288 following to the extent necessary or desirable, for the effective and efficient design,
289 implementation, and administration of the program consistent with the purposes set forth
290 in this chapter and to maximize outreach to covered employers and covered employees:
S. B. 226
- 12 -

25 LC 56 0309
291 (1) Services of private and public financial institutions, depositories, consultants,
292 actuaries, counsel, auditors, investment advisers, investment administrators, investment
293 management firms, other investment firms, third-party administrators, other professionals
294 and service providers, and state public retirement systems;
295 (2) Research, technical, financial, administrative, and other services; and
296 (3) Services of other state agencies to assist the board in the exercise of its powers and
297 duties.
298 (c) The board may make and enter into competitively procured contracts, agreements,
299 memoranda of understanding, arrangements, partnerships, or other arrangements to
300 collaborate and cooperate with, coordinate, or combine resources, investments, or
301 administrative functions with other governmental entities, including states or their agencies
302 or instrumentalities that maintain or are establishing retirement savings programs
303 compatible with the program, including collective, common, or pooled investments with
304 other funds of other states' programs with which the assets of the program are permitted by
305 law to be collectively invested, to the extent necessary or desirable for the effective and
306 efficient design, administration, and implementation of the program consistent with the
307 purposes set forth in this chapter, including the purpose of achieving economies of scale
308 and other efficiencies designed to minimize costs for the program and its participants and
309 the provisions of this chapter.
310 (d) When possible and practicable, the board shall use employer, other private sector, and
311 public infrastructure as well as common, collective, or pooled investment arrangements to
312 the extent desirable, to facilitate and enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of program
313 outreach, enrollment, contributions, record keeping, investment, distributions, compliance,
314 and other aspects of program design, administration, and implementation consistent with
315 the purposes set forth in this chapter, including the purpose of achieving economies of scale
316 and other efficiencies designed to minimize costs for the program and its participants and
317 the provisions of this chapter.
S. B. 226
- 13 -

25 LC 56 0309
318 (e) The board shall ensure that the program is designed and implemented in a manner
319 consistent with federal law, including favorable federal tax treatment, to the extent that it
320 applies and consistent with the program not being preempted by ERISA.
321 34-11-11.
322 (a) The board shall develop and disseminate materials designed to educate participants and
323 potential participants about the benefits of planning and saving for retirement and to help
324 participants decide the level of participation and savings strategies that may be appropriate,
325 including information in furtherance of financial capability and financial literacy.
326 (b) The board shall adopt rules that specify the contents, frequency, timing, and means of
327 required disclosures from the program to covered employees, participants, other individuals
328 eligible to participate in the program. Such disclosures shall include at least:
329 (1) The benefits associated with tax-favored retirement saving;
330 (2) The potential advantages and disadvantages associated with contributing to Roth
331 IRAs and, if applicable, traditional IRAs under the program;
332 (3) The eligibility rules for Roth IRAs and, if applicable, traditional IRAs;
333 (4) That the individual will be solely responsible for determining whether, and, if so,
334 how much, the individual is eligible to contribute on a tax-favored basis to an IRA;
335 (5) The penalty for excess contributions to IRAs and the method of correcting excess
336 contributions;
337 (6) Instructions for enrolling, making contributions, and opting out of participation;
338 (7) Instructions for opting out of the Roth IRA, the default contribution rate, and the
339 default investment if the covered employee prefers a traditional IRA, a higher or lower
340 contribution rate, or a different investment alternative;
341 (8) The potential availability of a saver's tax credit or saver's match program, including
342 the eligibility conditions for the credit and instructions on how to claim it;
S. B. 226
- 14 -

25 LC 56 0309
343 (9) That employees seeking tax, investment, or other financial advice should contact
344 appropriate professional advisors, and that covered employers are not in a position to
345 provide such advice and are not liable for decisions individuals make in relation to the
346 program;
347 (10) That the payroll deduction IRAs are intended not to be employer sponsored
348 retirement plans and that the program is not an employer sponsored retirement plan;
349 (11) The potential implications of account balances under the program for the application
350 of asset limits under certain public assistance programs;
351 (12) That the account owner is solely responsible for investment performance, including
352 market gains and losses, and that IRA accounts and rates of return are not guaranteed by
353 any employer, the state, the board, any board member or state official, or the program;
354 (13) Additional information about retirement and saving and other information designed
355 to promote financial literacy and capability; and
356 (14) How to obtain additional information about the program.
357 34-11-12.
358 (a) The board shall annually cause an audit of activities of the board, including, operations,
359 receipts, and expenditures to be maintained. Such audit shall be conducted by a certified
360 public accountant and shall include, but not be limited to, direct and indirect costs
361 attributable to the use of outside consultants, independent contractors, and any other
362 persons who are not state employees for the administration of the program. For the
363 purposes of the audit, an auditor shall have access to the properties and records of the
364 program and board and may prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of periodic
365 reports in relation to projects undertaken by the program.
366 (b) By six months after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall prepare and provide to
367 the Governor, the state treasurer, the appropriate committees of the Senate and House of
368 Representatives, and the public an audited financial report, prepared in accordance with
S. B. 226
- 15 -

25 LC 56 0309
369 generally accepted accounting principles, detailing the activities, operations, receipts, and
370 expenditures of the program and board during the preceding calendar year.
371 34-11-13.
372 (a) If a covered employer fails without reasonable cause to enroll a covered employee as
373 required under this chapter, the covered employer shall be subject to a penalty, payable to
374 the state, equal to:
375 (1) For the first calendar year the covered employer is noncompliant, $250.00 per
376 employee; or
377 (2) For each subsequent calendar year the covered employer is noncompliant, $500.00
378 per employee; noncompliance does not need to be consecutive to qualify for such
379 $500.00 penalty.
380 (b) The Department of Labor or the board shall have authority to impose the penalty in
381 subsection (a) of this Code section upon a finding that such violation has occurred.
382 (c) No penalty shall be imposed under subsection (a) of this Code section for any failure
383 for which it is established that the covered employer subject to liability for the penalty did
384 not know the failure existed and exercised reasonable diligence to meet the requirements
385 of this chapter.
386 (d) No penalty shall be imposed under subsection (a) of this Code section for any failure
387 if the covered employer corrects the violation within 90 days from the first date the covered
388 employer knew, or exercising reasonable diligence would have known, the violation of
389 subsection (a) of this Code section existed.
390 (e) A covered employer shall transmit a payroll deduction contribution to the program on
391 the earliest date the amount withheld from the covered employee's compensation can
392 reasonably be segregated from the covered employer's assets, but not later than the fifteenth
393 day of the month following the month in which the covered employee's contribution
394 amounts are withheld from his or her paycheck. Failure to remit such contributions on a
S. B. 226
- 16 -

25 LC 56 0309
395 timely basis shall be subject to a penalty, payable to the state, equal to $500.00 per
396 violation. The Department of Labor or the board shall have authority to impose such
397 penalty, upon a finding that such violation has occurred.
398 34-11-14.
399 (a) An eligible employer, a participating employer, or other employer is not and shall not
400 be liable for or bear responsibility for:
401 (1) An employee's decision as to which investments to choose;
402 (2) Investment decisions of the board or participants;
403 (3) The administration, investment, investment returns, or investment performance of the
404 program, including, but not limited to, any interest rate or other rate of return on any
405 contribution or account balance, provided that the eligible employer, participating
406 employer, or other employer is not involved in the administration or investment of the
407 program;
408 (4) Individuals' awareness of or compliance with the conditions and other provisions of
409 the tax laws that determine which individuals are eligible to make tax-favored
410 contributions to IRAs, in what amount, and in what time frame and manner;
411 (5) The program design or the benefits paid to participants; or
412 (6) Any loss, failure to realize any gain, or any other adverse consequences, including,
413 but not limited to, any adverse tax consequences or loss of favorable tax treatment, public
414 assistance, or other benefits incurred by any person solely and directly as a result of
415 participating in the program.
416 (b) No covered employer or other employer shall be, or shall be considered to be, a
417 fiduciary in relation to the program or any arrangement under the program.
S. B. 226
- 17 -

25 LC 56 0309
418 34-11-15.
419 (a) The state, the board, each trustee of the board, any other state official, state board,
420 commission, and agency, any member, officer, and employee thereof, and the program
421 shall:
422 (1) Have no responsibility for compliance by individuals with the conditions and other
423 provisions of the Internal Revenue Code that determine which individuals are eligible to
424 make tax-favored contributions to IRAs, in what amount, and in what time frame and
425 manner;
426 (2) Have no duty, responsibility, or liability to any party for the payment of any benefits
427 under the program, regardless of whether sufficient funds are available under the program
428 to pay such benefits;
429 (3) Not guarantee any interest rate or other rate of return on or investment performance
430 of any contribution or account balance; and
431 (4) Not be liable or responsible for any loss, deficiency, failure to realize any gain, or any
432 other adverse consequences, including, but not limited to, any adverse tax consequences
433 or loss of favorable tax treatment, public assistance, or other benefits, incurred by any
434 person as a result of participating in the program.
435 (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to guarantee any interest rate or other rate
436 of return on or investment performance of any contribution or account balance.
437 34-11-16.
438 (a) Individual account information relating to accounts under the program and relating to
439 individual participants, including, but not limited to, names, addresses, telephone numbers,
440 email addresses, personal identification information, investments, contributions, and
441 earnings shall be confidential and shall be maintained as confidential, provided that such
442 information may be disclosed:
S. B. 226
- 18 -

25 LC 56 0309
443 (1) To the extent necessary to administer the program in a manner consistent with this
444 chapter, the Internal Revenue Code, or any other federal or state law; or
445 (2) If the individual who provides the information or who is the subject of the
446 information expressly agrees in writing to the disclosure of the information.
447 (b) Information required to be confidential under subsection (a) of this Code section shall
448 not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records.
449 34-11-17.
450 The board may, in its discretion, phase in the program so that the ability to contribute first
451 applies on different dates for different classes of individuals, including employees of
452 employers of different sizes or types and individuals who are not employees, provided that
453 any such staged or phased-in implementation schedule shall be substantially completed on
454 or before January 1, 2028. Reserved."
455 SECTION 2.
456 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 226
- 19 -